Kansas, session 2025-2026, SB129.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. K.S.A. 20-2608 is hereby amended to read as follows: 20-
2608. (a) (1) Any judge may retire upon reaching age 65 or age 62 with the
completion of 10 years of credited service or the first day of the month
coinciding with or following the date that the total of the number of years
of credited service and the number of years of attained age of the judge is
equal to or more than 85 and upon making application for retirement to the
board.
(2) (A) Except as provided in subparagraph (B), any judge upon
reaching age 75 shall retire, except that when any judge attains the age of
75, such judge may, if such judge desires, finish serving the term during
which such judge attains the age of 75.
(B) A district magistrate judge regularly admitted to practice law in
Kansas who serves in a county with a population of 10,000 or fewer
people upon reaching age 78 shall retire.
(3) Upon retiring, each such judge as described in this subsection
shall receive retirement annuities as provided in K.S.A. 20-2610, and
amendments thereto.
(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a), any judge who
is otherwise eligible to retire may retire upon reaching age 60 and, having
total years of service of not less than 10 years, and upon making
application to the board. Any such judge who retires on and after July 1,
1993, and prior to attaining the age of 62 shall receive a retirement annuity
pursuant to K.S.A. 20-2610, and amendments thereto, based upon the
normal retirement age of 62 reduced by an amount equal to the product of
(1) such annual retirement annuity payable had the judge retired on the
normal retirement date, multiplied by (2) the product of .2% multiplied by
the number of months' difference, to the nearest whole month, between the
judge's attained age at the time of retirement and age 62.
(c) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a), on or after July
1, 1993, any judge who is otherwise eligible to retire may retire upon

SB 129 2
reaching age 55 with the completion of 10 years of service, and upon
making application to the board. Any such judge who retires prior to
attaining the age of 62 pursuant to this subsection shall receive a
retirement annuity pursuant to K.S.A. 20-2610, and amendments thereto,
based upon the normal retirement age of 62 reduced by an amount equal to
the total of:
(1) (A) The product of such annual retirement annuity payable had
the judge retired on the normal retirement date, multiplied by (B) the
product of .6% multiplied by the number of months' difference, to the
nearest whole month, between the member's attained age at the time of
retirement and age 60; and
(2) for any judge who retired on or after July 1, 1993, the product of
such annual retirement annuity payable had the judge retired on the normal
retirement date, multiplied by 4.8%.
The provisions of this subsection apply to any judge who retires before
the age of 62 and has attained age 55 but has not attained age 60, with the
completion of 10 years of service.
Sec. 2. K.S.A. 20-2608 is hereby repealed.
Sec. 3. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book.